Maryland, session 2025, SB0579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Local government” means:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0579*

SENATE BILL 579
(1) A charter county as defined in § 1–101 of the Local Government Article;
(2) A code county as defined in § 1–101 of the Local Government Article;
(3) A board of county commissioners;
(4) Baltimore City;
(5) A municipality as defined in § 1–101 of the Local Government Article;
(6) The Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission;
(7) The Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission;
(8) The Northeast Maryland Waste Disposal Authority;
(9) A community college or board of trustees for a community college
established or operating under Title 16 of the Education Article, not including Baltimore
City Community College;
(10) A county public library or board of trustees of a county public library
established or operating under Title 23, Subtitle 4 of the Education Article;
(11) The Enoch Pratt Free Library or Board of Trustees of the Enoch Pratt
Free Library;
(12) The Washington County Free Library or the Board of Trustees of the
Washington County Free Library;
(13) A special taxing district;
(14) A nonprofit community service corporation incorporated under State
law that is authorized to collect charges or assessments;
(15) Housing authorities created under Division II of the Housing and
Community Development Article;
(16) A sanitary district, sanitary commission, metropolitan commission, or
other sewer or water authority established or operating under public local law or public
general law;
(17) A regional development council;
(18) The Howard County Economic Development Authority;
(19) The Howard County Mental Health Authority;

SENATE BILL 579 3
(20) A commercial district management authority established by a county
or municipal corporation if provided under local law;
(21) The Baltimore City Police Department;
(22) A regional library resource center or a cooperative library corporation
established under Title 23, Subtitle 2 of the Education Article;
(23) Lexington Market, Inc., in Baltimore City;
(24) The Baltimore Public Markets Corporation, in Baltimore City;
(25) A nonprofit corporation serving as the local public transportation
authority for Carroll County pursuant to a contract or memorandum of understanding with
Carroll County;
(26) The nonprofit corporation serving as the animal control and licensing
authority for Carroll County pursuant to a contract or memorandum of understanding with
Carroll County (the Humane Society of Carroll County, Inc.);
(27) Garrett County Municipalities, Inc., in Garrett County;
(28) The nonprofit corporation serving as the local public transportation
authority for Garrett County pursuant to a contract or memorandum of understanding with
Garrett County (Garrett County Community Action Committee, Inc.); [and]
(29) The nonprofit corporation serving as the industrial development
authority of Carroll County established under Title 12, Subtitle 1 of the Economic
Development Article; AND
(30) THE HAGERSTOWN MULTI–USE SPORTS AND EVENTS FACILITY,
INC., IN WASHINGTON COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.